Utah statutes.
78A-2-409.   Certified transcripts prima facie correct.
A transcript of a certified court reporter's notes, written in longhand or
typewritten, certified by the court reporter as being a correct transcript of
evidence and proceedings, is prima facie a correct statement of the evidence
and proceedings.
